Louisiana, session 2026, HB1153.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1602.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1602.1. Authority to declare burn bans; governing authorities; parish and
municipalities
A.(1) The governing authority of any parish may declare a temporary ban on
burning within all or any portion of the parish when environmental conditions create
an elevated risk of wildfire or uncontrolled fire spread. The governing authority of
the parish shall lift a ban on burning when the risk ceases to be elevated.
(2) A ban on burning may be declared by ordinance, resolution of the parish
governing authority, or emergency proclamation issued by the parish president.
Notice of the ban shall be published in the official parish journal.
(3) The parish may provide additional reasonable public notice of a burn ban
through available communication channels including parish websites, social media,
emergency alert systems, or local media outlets.
(4) A ban on burning may prohibit open burning, including but not limited
to the following:
(a) Burning of yard debris.
(b) Land clearing burns.
(c) Burning of construction debris.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1153 ENROLLED
(d) Recreational fires not contained within fire pits or enclosures.
(5) The provisions of this Section do not apply to the following:
(a) Agricultural burning conducted in accordance with state law.
(b) Prescribed burns conducted by certified personnel.
(c) Cooking fires contained within grills or smokers.
(d) Recreational fires contained within fire pits or enclosures.
B.(1) The governing authority of any municipality may declare a temporary
ban on burning within municipal limits when weather or environmental conditions
create an elevated risk of wildfire or uncontrolled fire spread. The governing
authority of the municipality shall lift a ban on burning when the risk ceases to be
elevated.
(2) Municipal governing authorities may adopt ordinances establishing
procedures for issuing, extending, or terminating bans on burning.
(3) Municipal fire chiefs or emergency management officials may
recommend the issuance of a ban on burning based on fire risk conditions.
C.(1) Any person who knowingly and intentionally violates a ban on burning
declared pursuant to this Section shall be subject to civil penalties imposed by the
applicable parish or municipality.
(2) Civil penalties shall apply as follows:
(a) For a first offense, a five hundred dollar fine.
(b) For a second offense, a one thousand dollar fine.
(c) For a third or subsequent offense, a two thousand five hundred dollar
fine.
(3) Each day that a violation occurs constitutes a separate offense.
(4) Any person responsible for a fire resulting from a violation may be liable
for the costs of fire suppression and emergency response incurred by local fire
departments and municipal or parish governments.
D.(1) Any person who knowingly violates a ban on burning and whose
actions result in property damage exceeding five thousand dollars shall be fined not
more than one thousand dollars or imprisoned for not more than six months, or both.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1153 ENROLLED
(2) Any person who knowingly violates a ban on burning and whose actions
result in damage to critical infrastructure, as defined in R.S. 14:61, shall be fined not
more than twenty-five thousand dollars or imprisoned with or without hard labor for
not more than five years, or both.
(3) In addition to the penalties provided in this Subsection, the offender shall
pay restitution pursuant to Code of Criminal Procedure Article 883.2 to the owner
of any property damaged by the violation.
E. In addition to local and state law enforcement agencies, the provisions of
this Section may be enforced by fire department personnel and municipal code
enforcement officers.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.